trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="url"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="sym"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="mon"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
   
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
        <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="web"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-]+([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)+(/[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9_]+)*([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)*)</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="web"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Aa">
      <e r="LR"><i>A</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>A</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bb">
      <e r="LR"><i>B</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>B</l><r>b</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Cc">
      <e r="LR"><i>C</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>C</l><r>c</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Dd">
      <e r="LR"><i>D</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>D</l><r>d</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ee">
      <e r="LR"><i>E</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>E</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ff">
      <e r="LR"><i>F</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>F</l><r>f</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gg">
      <e r="LR"><i>G</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>G</l><r>g</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Hh">
      <e r="LR"><i>H</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>H</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ii">
      <e r="LR"><i>I</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>I</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Jj">
      <e r="LR"><i>J</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>J</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ll">
      <e r="LR"><i>L</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>L</l><r>l</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mm">
      <e r="LR"><i>M</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>M</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Nn">
      <e r="LR"><i>N</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>N</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Oo">
      <e r="LR"><i>O</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>O</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pp">
      <e r="LR"><i>P</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>P</l><r>p</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Rr">
      <e r="LR"><i>R</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>R</l><r>r</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ss">
      <e r="LR"><i>S</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>S</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Tt">
      <e r="LR"><i>T</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>T</l><r>t</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Yy">
      <e r="LR"><i>Y</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>Y</l><r>y</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Uu">
      <e r="LR"><i>U</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>U</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Vv">
      <e r="LR"><i>V</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>V</l><r>v</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ww">
      <e r="LR"><i>W</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>W</l><r>w</r></p></e>
    </pardef>


	
   <pardef n="ordinals">
    
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]2|2)</re>
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]3|3)</re>
        <p>
          <l>rd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>1[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]*([4-90]|1[0-9])</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ordinals-century">
      <e>
        <re>([2-9][04-9]|1[0-9]|[4-9])</re>
        <i>th</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]1|1)</re>
        <i>st</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]2|2)</re>
        <i>nd</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]3|3)</re>
        <i>rd</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BC">
      <e><i></i></e>
      <e><i><b/>BC</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>CE</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>BCE</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>AD</i></e>
      <!-- As this can be sentence final, allow sentence to be grabbed as usual -->
      <e><i><b/>B.C</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>C.E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>B.C.E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>A.D</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>B.<b/>C</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>C.<b/>E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>A.<b/>D</i></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Asian"><par n="Aa"/><i>sian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Christianity" a="doriua"><par n="Cc"/><i>hristianit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Molotov cocktail"><par n="Mm"/><i>olotov<b/>cocktail</i><par n="house__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Englishwoman"><par n="Ee"/><i>nglishwom</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Andalusian"><par n="Aa"/><i>ndalusian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Australian"><par n="Aa"/><i>ustralian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Byelorussian"><par n="Bb"/><i>yelorussian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Bavarian"><par n="Bb"/><i>avarian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Chinese"><par n="Cc"/><i>hinese</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Falangist"><par n="Ff"/><i>alangist</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Guatemalan"><par n="Gg"/><i>uatemalan</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Indian"><par n="Ii"/><i>ndian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Icelandic"><par n="Ii"/><i>celandic</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Jamaican"><par n="Jj"/><i>amaican</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Lithuanian"><par n="Ll"/><i>ithuanian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Mexican"><par n="Mm"/><i>exican</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Nepalese"><par n="Nn"/><i>epalese</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Nigerian"><par n="Nn"/><i>igerian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Orthodox"><par n="Oo"/><i>rthodox</i><par n="bass__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Paraguayan"><par n="Pp"/><i>araguayan</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Persian"><par n="Pp"/><i>ersian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Syrian"><par n="Ss"/><i>yrian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Sudanese"><par n="Ss"/><i>udanese</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Thai"><par n="Tt"/><i>hai</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Taiwanese"><par n="Tt"/><i>aiwanese</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Ukrainian"><par n="Uu"/><i>krainian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Uruguayan"><par n="Uu"/><i>ruguayan</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Venetian"><par n="Vv"/><i>enetian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Vietnamese"><par n="Vv"/><i>ietnamese</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Yugoslav"><par n="Yy"/><i>ugoslav</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Yugoslavian"><par n="Yy"/><i>ugoslavian</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Franciscan"><par n="Ff"/><i>ranciscan</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Latin American"><par n="Ll"/><i>atin<b/>American</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th and (y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>and<b/></i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i/><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th-(y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i>-</i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i/><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brazilian"><par n="Bb"/><i>razilian</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Julian" a="greenbreen"><par n="Jj"/><i>ulian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Gregorian" a="greenbreen"><par n="Gg"/><i>regorian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Hamiltonian" a="greenbreen"><par n="Hh"/><i>amiltonian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Euclidean" a="greenbreen"><par n="Ee"/><i>uclidean</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanian" a="greenbreen"><par n="Rr"/><i>omanian</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanian" a="greenbreen"><par n="Rr"/><i>omanian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e>      <par n="emails"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="urls"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="ordinals"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="numeros"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="coma"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="cometa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="paresq"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="pardret"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separ"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="guionet"/>    </e>
